784 « CHAPTER 29
L
Johnson was a man who believed in the active use of power. Between 1963 and 1966, he compiled the most impressive legislative record of any president since Franklin Roosevelt. He was aided by the tidal wave of emotion that followed the death of President Kennedy, which helped win support for The "Great manY New Frontier proposals.
Society” Fut J°hnson also constructed a remarkable reform program of his own, one that he ultimately labeled the "Great Society.” And he won approval of much of it through the same sort of skillful lobbying in Congress that had made him an effective majority leader.
Johnson envisioned himself as a great "coalition builder.” He wanted the support of everyone, and for a time he nearly got it. His first year in office was, by necessity, dominated by the campaign for reelection. There was little doubt that he would win-particularly after the Republican Party fell under the sway of its right wing and nominated the conservative Senator Barry Goldwater of Arizona. In the November 1964 election, the president received a larger plurality of the popular vote, over 61 percent, than any candidate before or since. Goldwater managed to carry only his home state of Arizona and five states in the Deep South. Record Democratic majorities in both houses of Congress, many of whose members had been swept into office only because of the margin of Johnson’s victory, ensured that the president would be able to fulfill many of his goals.
The Assault on Poverty
For the first time since the 1930s, the federal government took steps in the 1960s to create important new social welfare pro-
Medicare and §rams' The most imPorunt of these, per-Medicaid haps, was Medicare: a program to provide federal aid to the elderly for medical expenses. Its enactment in 1965 came at the end of a bitter, twenty-year debate between those who believed in the concept of national health assistance and those who denounced it as "socialized medicine.” But the program as it went into effect pacified many critics. For one thing, it avoided the stigma of
"welfare” by making Medicare benefits available to all elderly Americans, regardless of need (just as Social Security had done with pensions). That created a large middle-class constituency for the program. The program also defused the opposition of the medical community by allowing doctors serving Medicare patients to practice privately and to charge their normal fees; Medicare simply shifted responsibility for paying those fees from the patient to the government. In 1966, Johnson steered to passage the Medicaid program, which extended federal medical assistance to welfare recipients and other indigent people of all ages.
Medicare and Medicaid were early steps in a much larger assault on poverty-one that Kennedy had been planning in

ETERNAL FLAME
The John F. Kennedy Eternal Flame memorializes the slain president. It is located at Kennedy's grave site in Arlington National Cemetery. The site was designed by architect John Carl Warnecke, a long-time friend of the president. (© Getty Images News/Getty Images) the last months of his life and that Johnson launched only weeks after taking office. The centerpiece of this "war on poverty,” as Johnson called it, was the Office of Economic Opportunity (OEO), which created an array of new educational, employment, housing, and health-care programs. But the OEO was controversial from the start, in part because of its commitment to the idea of "Community Action.”
Community Action was an effort to involve members of poor communities themselves in the planning and administration of the programs designed to help them. The Community Action programs provided jobs for many poor people and gave them valuable experience in administrative and political work. Many men and women who went on to significant careers in Community politics or community organizing, includ-Action	ing many black and Hispanic politicians, as
Program	well as many Indians, got their start in
Community Action programs. But despite its achievements, the Community Action approach proved impossible to sustain, both because of administrative failures and because the apparent excesses of a few agencies damaged the popular image of the Community Action programs and,
indeed, the war on poverty as a whole.
The OEO spent nearly $3 billion during its first two years of existence, and it helped reduce poverty in some areas. But it fell far short of eliminating poverty. That was in part because of the weaknesses of the programs themselves and in part because funding for them, inadequate from the beginning, dwindled as the years passed and a costly war in Southeast Asia became the nation’s first priority.
Cities, Schools, and Immigration
Closely tied to the antipoverty program were federal efforts to promote the revitalization of decaying cities and to strengthen
CIVIL RIGHTS, VIETNAM, AND THE ORDEAL OF LIBERALISM
♦ 785 the nation’s schools. The Housing Act of 1961 offered $4.9 billion in federal grants to cities for the preservation of open spaces, the Housing and development of mass-transit systems, and
Urban	the subsidization of middle-income housing.
Development In 1966, Johnson established a new cabinet agency, the Department of Housing and
Urban Development (whose first secretary, Robert Weaver, was the first African American ever to serve in the cabinet). Johnson also inaugurated the Model Cities program, which offered federal subsidies for urban redevelopment pilot programs.
Kennedy had long fought for federal aid to public education, but he had failed to overcome two important obstacles: many Americans feared that aid to education was the first step toward federal control of the schools, and Catholics insisted that federal assistance must extend to parochial as well as public schools. Johnson managed to circumvent both objections with the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 and a series of subsequent measures. The bills extended aid to both private and parochial schools and based the aid on the economic conditions of the students, not on the needs of the schools themselves. Total annual federal expenditures for education and technical training rose from $5 billion to $12 billion between 1964 and 1967.
The Johnson administration also supported the Immigration
Act of 1965, one of the most important pieces of legislation of
T	the 1960s. The law maintained a strict
Immigration	q	,
Act of 1965 limit on the number of newcomers admit-
ted to the country each year (170,000), but it eliminated the "national origins” system established in the 1920s, which gave preference to immigrants from northern Europe over those from other parts of the world. It continued to restrict immigration from some parts of Latin America, but it allowed people from all parts of Europe, Asia, and Africa to enter the United States on an equal basis. By the early 1970s, the character of American immigration had changed, with members of new national groups-and particularly large groups
of Asians-entering the United States and changing the character of the American population.
Legacies of the Great Society
Failures and Achievements of the Great Society
Taken together, the Great Society reforms meant a significant increase in federal spending. For a time, rising tax revenues from the growing economy nearly compensated for the new expenditures. In 1964, Johnson managed to win passage of the $11.5 billion tax cut that Kennedy had first proposed in 1962. The cut increased the federal deficit, but substantial economic growth over the next several years made up for much of the revenue initially lost. As Great Society programs began to multiply, however, and particularly as they began to compete with the escalating costs of America’s military ventures, federal spending rapidly outpaced increases in revenues. In 1961, the federal government had spent $94.4 billion. By 1970, that sum had risen to $196.6 billion.
The high costs of the Great Society programs, the deficiencies and failures of many of them, and the inability of the government to find the revenues to pay for them contributed to a growing disillusionment in later years with the idea of federal efforts to solve social problems. By the 1980s, many Americans had become convinced that the Great Society experiments had not worked and that, indeed, government programs to solve social prob-
lems could not work. But the Great Society, despite many failures, was also responsible for some significant achievements. It substantially reduced hunger in America. It made medical care available to millions of elderly and poor people who would otherwise have had great difficulty affording it. It contributed to the greatest reduction in poverty in American history. In 1959, according to the most widely accepted estimates, 21 percent of the American people lived below
THE JOHNSON TREATMENT
Lyndon Johnson was legendary for his powers of persuasion—for a combination of charm and intimidation that often worked on even the most experienced politicians. He is shown here in the Oval Office meeting with his old friend Senator Richard Russell of Georgia and demonstrating one of his most powerful and unsettling techniques of persuasion: moving so close to the person with whom he was talking as to be almost touching him. (LBJ Library Photo by Yoichi Okamoto) 786 < CHAPTER 29
the official poverty line. By 1969, only 12 percent remained below that line. The improvements affected blacks and whites in about the same proportion: 56 percent of the black population had lived in poverty in 1959, while only 32 percent did so ten years later-a 42 percent reduction; 18 percent of all whites had been poor in 1959, but only 10 percent were poor a decade later-a 44 percent reduction. Much of that progress was a result of economic growth, but some of it was a result of Great Society programs.
THE BATTLE FOR RACIAL
EQUALITY
The nation’s most important domestic initiative in the 1960s was the effort to provide justice and equality to African Americans. It was the most difficult commitment, the one that produced the severest strains on American society. It was also the most urgent. Black Americans were themselves ensuring that the nation would have to deal with the problem of race.
Expanding Protests
John Kennedy had long been sympathetic to the cause of racial justice, but he was hardly a committed crusader. His intervention during the 1960 campaign to help win the release of Martin Luther King Jr. from a Georgia prison won him a large plurality of the black vote. But like many presidents before him, he feared alienating southern Democratic voters and members of Congress.
BIRMINGHAM, 1963 In one of the scenes that horrified many Americans watching on television, police in Birmingham, Alabama, turn fire hoses full force on civil rights demonstrators, knocking many of them to the around
AP
Images) SNCC
His administration set out to contain the racial problem by expanding enforcement of existing laws and supporting litigation to overturn existing segregation statutes, hoping to make modest progress without creating politically damaging divisions.
But the pressure for more fundamental change could not be contained. In February I960, black college students in Greensboro, North Carolina, staged a sit-in at a segregated Woolworth’s lunch counter; and in the following weeks, similar demonstrations
spread throughout much of the South, forcing many merchants to integrate their facilities. In the fall of 1960, some of those who had participated in the sit-ins formed the Student Nonviolent Coordinating Committee (SNCC), which worked to keep the spirit of resistance alive.
In 1961, an interracial group of students, working with the Congress of Racial Equality (CORE), began what they called
"Freedom "freedom rides’’ (reviving a tactic CORE had Rides”	tried, without much success, in the 1940s).
Traveling by bus throughout the South, the freedom riders tried to force the desegregation of bus stations. In some places, they met with such savage violence at the hands of enraged whites that the president finally dispatched federal marshals to help keep the peace. Kennedy also ordered the integration of all bus and train stations. In the meantime, SNCC workers began fanning out through black communities and even into remote rural areas to encourage African Americans to challenge the obstacles to voting that the Jim Crow laws had created. The Southern Christian Leadership Conference (SCLC) also created citizen-education and other programs-many of them organized by Ella Baker, one of the most successful grassroots leaders of the movement-to mobilize black workers, farmers, housewives, and others to challenge segregation, disenfranchisement, and discrimination.
Continuing judicial efforts to enforce the integration of public education increased the pressure on national leaders to respond to the civil rights movement. In October 1962, a federal court ordered the University of Mississippi to enroll its first black student, James Meredith; Governor Ross Barnett, a strident segregationist, refused to enforce the order. When angry whites in Oxford, Mississippi, began rioting to protest the court decree, President Kennedy sent federal troops to the city to restore order and protect Meredith’s right to attend the university.
Events in Alabama in 1963 helped bring the growing movement to something of a climax. In April, Martin Luther King ,r. helped launch a series of nonviolent demonstrations in Birmingham, Alabama, a city perhaps unsurpassed in its commitment to segregation. Police Commissioner Eugene "Bull” Connor supervised a brutal effort to break up the peaceful marches, arresting hundreds of
CIVIL RIGHTS, VIETNAM, AND THE ORDEAL OF LIBERALISM
• 787 demonstrators and using attack dogs, tear gas, electric cattle prods, and fire hoses-at times even against small children-as
Birmingham much of the nation watched televised reports in horror. Two months later,
Governor George Wallace—who had won election in 1962 pledging staunch resistance to integration—pledged to stand in the doorway of a building at the University of Alabama to prevent the court-ordered enrollment of several black students. Only after the arrival of federal marshals and a visit from Attorney General Robert Kennedy did Wallace give way. His stand won him wide popularity among whites throughout the nation who were growing uncomfortable with the pace of integration. That same night, NAACP official Medgar Evers was murdered in Mississippi.
A
National Commitment The events in Alabama and Mississippi were a warning to the president that he could no longer contain or avoid the issue of race. In an important television address the night of the University of Alabama confrontation and the murder of Evers, President Kennedy spoke eloquently of the "moral issue” facing the nation. "If an American,” he asked, "because his skin is dark, . .
. cannot enjoy the full and free life which all of us want, then who among us would be content to have the color of his skin changed and stand in his place? Who among us would then be content with the counsels of patience and delay?” Days later, he introduced a series of new legislative proposals prohibiting segregation in "public accommodations” (stores, restaurants, theaters, hotels), barring discrimination in employment, and increasing the power of the government to file suits on behalf of school integration.
To generate support for the legislation, and to dramatize the power of the growing movement, more than 200,000 demonstrators marched
March on down the Mall in Washington, D.C., Washington	z ,	.	,, r
in August 1963 and gathered before the Lincoln Memorial for the greatest civil rights demonstration in the nation’s history. President Kennedy, who had at first opposed the idea of the march, in the end gave it his open support after receiving pledges from organizers that speakers would not criticize the administration. Martin Luther King Jr., in one of the greatest speeches of his distinguished oratorical career, roused the crowd with a litany of images prefaced again and again by the phrase "I have a dream.” The march was the high-water mark of the peaceful, interracial civil rights
movement.
The assassination of President Kennedy three months later gave new impetus to the battle for civil rights legislation. The ambitious measure that Kennedy had proposed in June 1963 had stalled in the Senate after having passed through the House of Representatives with relative ease. Early in 1964, after Johnson applied both
public and private pressure, supporters of the measure finally mustered the two-thirds majority necessary to close debate and end a filibuster by southern senators; and the Senate passed the most comprehensive civil rights bill in the nation’s history.
The Battle for Voting Rights
Having won a significant victory in one area, the civil rights
movement shifted its focus to another: voting rights. During
the summer of 1964, thousands of civil rights workers, black
and white, northern and southern, spread Freedom	.	.	.	„	.	.	.
Summer” out trough the South, but primarily in
Mississippi, to work on behalf of black voter registration and participation. The campaign was known as "freedom summer,” and it produced a violent response from some southern whites. Three of the first freedom workers to
MARTIN LUTHER KING JR. IN WASHINGTON, D.C.
Moments after completing his memorable speech during the August 1963 March on Washington, King waves to the vast and enthusiastic crowd that has gathered in front of the Lincoln Memorial to demand "equality and jobs. (© AP Images) DEBATING THE PAST

The Civil Rights Movement
ini TT? ear'y histories of the civil rights movement rest on a heroic narrative of moral purpose 1 JTlJCand personal courage by which great men and women inspired ordinary people to rise up and struggle for their rights. This narrative generally begins with the Brown decision of 1954 and the Montgomery bus boycott of 1955, continues through the civil rights campaigns of the early 1960s, and culminates in the Civil Rights Acts of 1964 and 1965. Central events in this narrative are the 1963 March on Washington, with Martin Luther King Jr.'s famous "I Have a Dream" speech, and King's assassination in 1968, which has often symbolized the end of the movement and the beginning of a different, more complicated period of the black freedom struggle. The key element of these narratives is the central importance to the movement of a few great leaders, most notably King himself. Among the best examples of this kind of narrative are Taylor Branch's powerful studies of the life and struggles of King, Parting the Waters (1988), Pillar of Fire (1998), and At Canaan's Edge (2006), as well as David Garrow's important study, Bearing the Cross (1986).
Few historians would deny the importance of King and other leaders to the successes of the civil rights movement. But a number of scholars have argued that the leader-centered narrative obscures the vital contributions of ordinary people in communities throughout the South, and the nation, to the struggle. John Dittmer's Local People: The Struggle for Civil Rights in Mississippi (1994) and Charles Payne's I've Got the Light of Freedom (1995) both examine the day-to-day work of the movement's rank and file in the early 1960s and argue that their collective efforts were at least as important as those of King and other leaders. Only by understanding the local origins of the movement, these and other scholars argue, can we understand its true character.
Scholars also disagree about the time frame of the movement. Rather than beginning the story in 1954 or 1955 (as in Robert Weisbrot's excellent 1991 synthesis Freedom Bound or William Chafe's important 1981 local study Civilities and Civil Rights, which examined the Greensboro sit-ins of 1961), a
number of scholars have tried to move the story into both earlier periods and later ones. Robin Kelley's Race Rebels (1994) emphasizes the important contributions of working-class African Americans, who organized some of the earliest civil rights demonstrations—sit-ins, marches, and other efforts to challenge segregation—long before the conventional dates for the beginning of the movement. Gail O'Brien's The Color of the Law (1999) examines a 1946 "race riot" in Columbia, Tennessee, citing it as a signal of the early growth of African American militancy.
Other scholars have looked beyond the 1960s and beyond the South to incorporate events outside the orbit of the formal "movement" in the history of the civil rights struggle. A growing literature on northern, urban, and relatively radical activists emphasizes the challenges facing northern African Americans and the very different tactics and strategies that they often chose to pursue their goals. The enormous attention historians have given to the life and legacy of Malcolm X—among them Alex Haley's influential Autobiography of Malcolm X (1965) and Michael Eric Dyson's Making Malcolm (1996)—is one example of this, as is the increasing attention scholars have given to black radicalism in the late 1960s and beyond and to such militant groups as the Black Panthers.
arrive in the South-two whites, Andrew Goodman and Michael Schwerner, and one African American, James Chaney-were brutally murdered by Ku Klux Kian members with the support of local police in Neshoba County, Mississippi.
The "freedom summed’ also produced the Mississippi Freedom Democratic Party (MFDP), an integrated alternative to the regular state party organization. Under the leadership of Fannie Lou Hamer and others, the MFDP challenged the regular party’s right to its seats at the Democratic National Convention that summer. President Johnson, eager to avoid antagonizing anyone (even southern white Democrats who seemed likely to support his Republican opponent), enlisted King’s help to broker a compromise. It permitted the MFDP to be seated as observers, with promises of party reforms later on, while the regular state party retained its official standing. Both sides grudgingly accepted the agreement. Both were embittered by it.
A year later, in March 1965, King helped organize a major demonstration in Selma, Alabama, to press the demand for the right of blacks to register to vote. Selma sheriff Jim Clark led local police in a brutal attack on the demonstrators-which, as in Birmingham, received graphic television coverage and
horrified many viewers across the nation. Two northern whites participating in the Selma march were murdered in the course of the effort there-one, a minister, beaten to death in the streets of the town; the other, a Detroit housewife, shot as she drove along a highway at night with a black passenger in her
Voting	car- nationa^ outrage that followed the
Rights Act events in Alabama helped push Lyndon Johnson to propose and win passage of the
Civil Rights Act of 1965, better known as the Voting Rights Act, which provided federal protection to blacks attempting to exercise their right to vote. But important as such gains were, they failed to satisfy the rapidly rising expectations of African Americans as the focus of the movement began to move from political to economic issues.
The Changing Movement
For decades, the nation’s African American population had been
undergoing a major demographic shift; and by the 1960s, the
problem of racial injustice was no longer primarily southern and
rural, as it had been earlier in the century. By 1966, 69 percent
788
BROWN V. BOARD OF EDUCATION
This photograph, taken for an Atlanta newspaper, illustrated the long and dangerous walk that Linda Brown, one of the plaintiffs in the famous desegregation case that ultimately reached the Supreme Court, had to travel each day on her way to a segregated school in Topeka, Kansas. An all-white school was located close to her home, but to reach the black school she had to attend required a long walk and a long bus ride each day. Not only does the picture illustrate the difficulties segregation created for Linda Brown, it was also a part of a broad publicity campaign launched by the supporters of the case. (Photo by Carl Iwasaki/© Time & Life Pictures/Getty Images) Even Brown v. Board of Education (1954), the great landmark of the legal challenge to segregation, has been subject to reexamination. Richard Kluger's narrative history of the Brown decision, Simple Justice (1975), is a classic statement of the traditional view of Brown as a triumph over injustice. But critics have been less certain of the dramatic success of the ruling. James T. Patterson's Brown v. Board of Education: A Civil Rights Milestone and Its Troubled Legacy (2001) argues that the Brown decision long preceded any national consensus on the need to end segregation and that its impact was far less decisive than earlier scholars have suggested. Michael Klarman's From Jim Crow to Civil Rights (2004) examines the role of the Supreme Court in advancing civil rights and suggests, among other things, that the Brown decision may actually have retarded racial progress in the South for a time because of the enormous backlash it created. Charles Ogletree's All Deliberate Speed (2004) and Derrick Bell's Silent Covenants (2004) both argue that the Court's decision did not provide an effective enforcement mechanism for desegregation and in many other ways failed to support measures that would have
made school desegregation a reality. They note as evidence for this view that American public schools are now more segregated—even if not forcibly by law—than they were at the time of the Brown decision.
As the literature on the African American freedom struggles of the twentieth century has grown, historians have begun to speak of civil rights movements, rather than a single, cohesive movement. In this way, scholars recognize that struggles of this kind take many more forms, and endure through many more periods of history, than the traditional accounts suggest. •
UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE, AND EVALUATE
1.	The view of the civil rights movement established by the early histories—accounts that focused on the moral purpose and courage of a few great leaders—remains the most widely accepted view of the movement. Why is that?
2.	If historians now speak of plural civil rights movements, what are these movements?
3.	Why are the contributions of local grassroots workers so often overlooked, in studies of the civil rights movement as well as in accounts of other great events in American history?
of American blacks were living in metropolitan areas and 45 percent outside the South. Although the economic condition of much of American society was improving, in the poor urban communities in which the black population was concentrated, things were getting significantly worse. Well over half of all American nonwhites lived in poverty at the beginning of the 1960s; black unemployment was twice that of whites.
By the mid-1960s, therefore, the issue of race was moving out of the South and into the rest of the nation. The battle n	against school desegregation had moved
DeUmcto°	beyond the initial assault on de jure segrega-
Segregation	tion (segregation by law) to an attack on de
facto segregation (segregation in practice, as through residential patterns), thus carrying the fight into northern cities. Many African American leaders (and their white supporters) were demanding, similarly, that the battle against job discrimination move to a new level: employers not only should abandon negative measures to deny jobs to blacks; they also should adopt positive measures to recruit minorities, thus compensating for past injustices. Lyndon Johnson gave his tentative support to the concept of "affirmative action" in 1965. Over the
next decade, affirmative action guidelines gradually extended to all institutions doing business with or receiving funds from the federal government (including schools and universities)-and to many others as well.
A symbol of the movement’s new direction, and of the problems it would cause, was a major campaign in the summer of 1966 in Chicago, in which King played a prominent role. Organizers of the Chicago campaign hoped to direct national attention to housing and employment discrimination in northern industrial cities in much the same way similar campaigns had exposed legal racism in the South. But the Chicago campaign not only evoked vicious and at times violent opposition from white residents of that city; it also failed to arouse the national conscience in the way events in the South had.
Urban Violence
Well before the Chicago campaign, the problem of urban poverty was thrust into national attention when violence broke out in black neighborhoods in major cities. There were a few scattered disturbances in the summer of 1964, most notably in
789
790 * CHAPTER 29
Harlem. The first large race riot since the end of World War II occurred the following summer in the Watts section of Los Angeles. In the midst of a seemingly routine traffic arrest, a
Watts Riot white police officer struck a protesting black bystander with his club. The incident triggered a storm of anger and a week of violence (and revealed how deeply African Americans in Los Angeles, and in other cities, resented their treatment at the hands of local police). As many as 10,000 people were estimated to have participated in the violence in Watts-attacking white motorists, burning buildings, looting stores, and sniping at policemen. Thirty-four people died during the Watts uprising, which was eventually quelled by the National Guard; twenty-eight of the dead were black. In the summer of 1966, there were forty-three additional outbreaks, the most serious of them in Chicago and Cleveland. And in the summer of 1967, there were eight major outbreaks, including the largest of them all-a racial clash in Detroit in which forty-three people (thirty-three
of them black) died.
Televised reports of the violence alarmed millions of Americans and created both a new sense of urgency and a growing sense of doubt among many of those whites who had embraced the cause of racial justice only a few years
before. A special Commission on Civil Disorders, created by the president in response to the disturbances, issued a celebrated report in the spring of 1968 recommending massive spending to eliminate the abysmal conditions of the ghettos. "Only a commitment to national action on an unprecedented scale/’ the commission concluded, "can shape a future compatible with the historic ideals of American society." To many white Americans, however, the lesson of the riots was the need for stern measures to stop violence and lawlessness.
Black Power
Shift from Integration to Racial Distinction
Disillusioned with the ideal of peaceful change in cooperation with whites, an increasing number of African Americans were turning to a new approach to the racial issue: the philosophy of "black power.” Black power could mean many different things. But in all its forms, it suggested a move away from interracial cooperation
and toward increased awareness of racial distinctiveness. It was part of a long nationalist tradition among African Americans that extended back into slavery and that had its most visible
CIVIL RIGHTS, VIETNAM, AND THE ORDEAL OF LIBERALISM 791
twentieth century expression in the Garvey movement of the 1920s.
Perhaps the most enduring impact of the black-power ideology was a social and psychological one: instilling racial pride in African Americans, who lived in a society whose dominant culture generally portrayed African Americans as inferior to whites. It encouraged the growth of black studies in schools and universities. It helped stimulate important black literary and artistic
An
Increasingly Divided Civil Rights Movement
movements. It produced a new interest among many African Americans in their African roots. It led to a rejection by some blacks of certain cultural practices borrowed from white society: ’'Afro” hairstyles began to replace artificially straightened hair; some blacks began to adopt African styles of dress and new, African names.
But black power had political manifestations as well, most notably in creating a deep schism within the civil rights movement. Traditional black organizations that had emphasized cooperation with sympathetic whites-groups such as the NAACP, the Urban League, and King's Southern Christian Leadership Conference-now faced competition from radical groups. The Student Nonviolent Coordinating Committee and the Congress of Racial Equality had both begun as relatively moderate, interracial organizations; SNCC was originally a stu-
dent branch of the SCLC. By the mid-1960s, however, these and other groups were calling for radical and occasionally even violent action against the racism of white society and were openly rejecting the approaches of older, more established black leaders.
Particularly alarming to many whites (and to some African Americans as well) were organizations that existed outside the mainstream civil rights movement. In Oakland, California, the Black Panther Party (founded by Huey Newton and Bobby Seale) promised to defend black rights even if that required violence. Black Panthers organized along semimilitary lines and wore weapons openly and proudly. They were, in fact, more the victims of violence from the police than they were practitioners of violence themselves. But they created an image, quite deliberately, of militant radicals willing to fight for justice, in Newton’s words, 'Through the barrel of a gun.”
Malcolm X
In Detroit, a once-obscure black nationalist group, the Nation of Islam, gained new prominence. Founded in 1931 by Elijah Poole
(who converted to Islam and renamed him-Nation of self Elijah Muhammad), the movement SLAM	taught African Americans to take responsibil-
ity for their own lives, to live by strict codes of behavior, and to reject any dependence on whites. The most celebrated of the Black Muslims, as whites often termed them, was Malcolm Little, a former drug addict and pimp who had spent time in prison and had rebuilt his life after joining the movement. He adopted the
name Malcolm X ("X” to denote his lost African surname).
Malcolm became one of the movement’s most influential spokesmen, particularly among younger blacks, as a result of his intelligence, his oratorical skills, and his harsh, uncompromising opposition to all forms of racism and oppression. He did not advocate violence, as his critics often claimed; but he insisted that black people had the right to defend themselves, violently if necessary, from those who assaulted them. Malcolm died in 1965 when black gunmen, presumably under orders from rivals within the Nation of Islam, assassinated him in New York.
But Malcolm’s influence did not die with him. A book he had been working on before his death with the writer Alex Haley (The Autobiography of Malcolm X) attracted wide attention after its publication in 1965 and spread his reputation broadly through the nation. Years after his death, he was to many African Americans as important and revered a symbol as Martin Luther King Jr.
MALCOLM X
Malcolm X, a leader of the militant Nation of Islam, arrives in Washington, D.C., in May 1963 to set up a headquarters for the organization there. Malcolm was hated and feared by many whites during his lifetime. After he was assassinated in 1965, he became a widely revered hero among African Americans. (© Bettmann/Corbis) 792
CHAPTER 29
“FLEXIBLE RESPONSE”
AND THE COLD WAR
In international affairs as much as in domestic reform, the optimistic liberalism of the Kennedy and Johnson administrations dictated a more positive, more active approach to dealing with the nation’s problems than in the past. And just as the new activism in domestic reform proved more difficult and divisive than liberals had imagined, so too it created frustrations and failures in foreign policy.
Diversifying Foreign Policy
The Kennedy administration entered office convinced that the United States needed to be able to counter communist aggression in more-flexible ways than the atomic-weapons-oriented
"Flexible defense strategy of the Eisenhower years
Response” had Permitted. In particular, Kennedy was unsatisfied with the nation’s ability to meet communist threats in "emerging areas” of the Third World-the areas in which, Kennedy believed, the real struggle
against communism would be waged in the future. He gave enthusiastic support to the expansion of the Special Forces (or "Green Berets,” as they were soon known)-soldiers trained specifically to fight guerrilla conflicts and other limited wars.
Kennedy also favored expanding American influence through peaceful means. To repair the badly deteriorating relationship with Latin America, he proposed an "Alliance for Progress”: a series of projects for peaceful development and stabilization of the nations of that region. Kennedy also inaugurated the Agency for International Development (AID) to coordinate foreign aid. And he established what became one of his most popular innovations: the Peace Corps, which sent young American volunteers abroad to work in developing areas.
Among the first foreign policy ventures of the Kennedy administration was a disastrous assault on the Castro government in Cuba. The Eisenhower administration had begun the project; and by the time Kennedy took office, the CIA had been working
Bay of Pigs f°r mont^s to tra^n a sma^ army of anti-Castro Cuban exiles in Central America. On April
17, 1961, with the approval of the new president, 2,000 of the armed exiles landed at the Bay of Pigs in Cuba, expecting first American air support and then a spontaneous uprising
UNITED STATES
Houston
Orle<


TACIT 1C OCEAN
GUATEMALA 1954—U.S.-backed overthrow of socialist government 1954-1976,1981 — military support
CUBA
1959—Batista overthrown and Castro inhaled 1961—Unsuccessful anti-Castro invasion baeKed by< -U.S. blockade of Cuba during missile crisis
MEXICO
EL SALVADOR 1980—Increased
military and economic support to government during civil war NICARAGUA 1979—Overthrow of Somoza followed by U.S. aid to Contras 1981-1990—U.S. military and r economic support for anti-z'"^ Sandinista forces	;
c<5st,
RIC,
U.S. military and" economic aid
ATLANTIC
OCEAN
1994—U.S.
intervenes	VIRGIN
ofAristfde
to PUERTO
Domingo R|CO
DOMINICAN REPUBLIC
1965-1966—Occupation ° by U.S. forces following
overthrow of Trujillo
HAITI 1986—U.S.
flies Jean-Claude Duvalier into exile 
-TA
Guantanamo (U.S.-leased naval base) JAMAICA--?--
Caribbean
HONDURAS
Sea f

GRENADA
1983—Invasion by U.S. and regional allies; restoration of pro-Western gqyernment


COLOMBIA
VENEZUELA >	*>v-
1958—Anti-Nixon riots <GUYAN/v
PANAMA
1978—Canal Zone Treaty-control returned to Panama. U.S. retains control canal operation to 1999 1989—U.S. troops ensure ouster-Of Norieqa « „
'	• Bogota



A" BRAZIL
THE UNITED STATES IN LATIN AMERICA, 1954-1996
The Cold War greatly increased the readiness of the Unllpd ,L This map presents the many times and ways in which Washington ordered interventions in Central America, the Caribbean and th a 0 Intervene in the affairs of its Latin American neighbors, interventions were driven by Cold War concerns—by fears that communists might take over nations near the Unitpd	VT arn nations of South America. During much of this period, the
-----„----------— ___________________________________________....___________.._______ as hey had taken over Cuba in the early 1960s.
» What other interests motivated the United States to exert influence in Latin America, even after the end of the Cold War?
CIVIL RIGHTS, VIETNAM, AND THE ORDEAL OF LIBERALISM
• 793 by the Cuban people on their behalf. They received neither. At the last minute, as it became clear that things were going badly, Kennedy withdrew the air support, fearful of involving the United States too directly in the invasion. The expected uprising did not occur. Instead, well-armed Castro forces easily crushed the invaders, and within two days the entire mission had collapsed.
Confrontations with the Soviet Union
In the grim aftermath of the Bay of Pigs, Kennedy traveled to Vienna in June 1961 for his first meeting with Soviet premier Nikita Khrushchev. Their frosty exchange of views did little to reduce tensions between the two nations-nor did Khrushchev’s veiled threat of war if the United States continued to support a noncommunist West Berlin in the heart of East Germany.
Khrushchev was particularly unhappy about the mass exodus of residents of East Germany to the West through the easily traversed border in the center of Berlin. But he ultimately found a method short of war to stop it. Before dawn on August 13, 1961, the East German government, complying with directives from Moscow, began constructing a wall between East and West Berlin. Guards fired on those who continued to try to escape from East to West. For nearly thirty years, the Berlin Wall served as the most potent physical symbol of the conflict between the communist and noncommunist worlds.
The rising tensions culminated the following October in the most dangerous and dramatic crisis of the Cold War. On October 14, aerial reconnaissance photos produced clear evidence that the Soviets were constructing sites in Cuba for
ENNEDY IN BERLIN, 1963
President John F. Kennedy looks across the Berlin Wall from a platform built to allow 1 to see into East Berlin. Shortly afterward he gave a powerful speech to a vast crowd of West Berliners. Thet speech is well received in Europe and America. But it followed another important speech ,n which Kennedy spoke easing nsions between the West and the communist world. (0 Rue des Archives/The Granger Collection, New York)
offensive nuclear weapons. To the Soviets, placing missiles in Cuba probably seemed a reasonable-and relatively inexpensive-way to counter the presence of American missiles in _	Turkey (and a way to deter any future
Crisis	American invasion of Cuba). But to
Kennedy and most other Americans, the missile sites represented an act of aggression by the Soviets toward the United States. Almost immediately, the president decided that the weapons could not be allowed to remain. On October 22, he ordered a naval and air blockade around Cuba, a "quarantine” against all offensive weapons. Preparations were under way for an American air attack on the missile sites when, late in the evening of October 26, Kennedy received a message from Khrushchev implying that the Soviet Union would remove the missile bases in exchange for an American pledge not to invade Cuba. Ignoring other, tougher Soviet messages, the president agreed. The crisis was over.
Johnson and the World
Lyndon Johnson entered the presidency lacking John Kennedy’s prior, albeit limited, experience with international affairs. He was eager, therefore, not only to continue the policies of his predecessor but also to prove quickly that he too was a strong and forceful leader.
An internal rebellion in the Dominican Republic gave him an early opportunity to do so. A 1961 assassination had toppled the repressive dictatorship of General Rafael Trujillo, and for the next four years various factions in the country had struggled for dominance. In the spring of 1965, a conservative military regime began to collapse in the face of a revolt by a broad range of groups on behalf of the left-wing nationalist Juan Bosch. Arguing (without any evidence) that Bosch planned
to establish a pro-Castro, communist regime, Johnson dispatched 30,000 American troops to quell the disorder. Only after a conservative candidate defeated Bosch in a 1966 election were the forces withdrawn.
From Johnson’s first moments in office, however, his foreign policy was almost totally dominated by the bitter civil war in Vietnam and by the expanding involvement of the United States there.
Intervention in THE Dominican Republic
THE AGONY OF VIETNAM
George Kennan, who helped devise the containment doctrine that drew America into war in Vietnam, once called the conflict the most disastrous of all America’s undertakings over
er
The Vietnam Commitment
T WT1965,
the Department of Defense released a film intended for American soldiers about to IIM embark for service in Vietnam and designed to explain why the United States had found it necessary to commit so many lives and resources to the defense of a small and distant land. The film was titled Why Vietnam?— a question many Americans have pondered and debated in the decades (© AFP/Getty Images)
since. The debate has centered on two questions. One is an effort to assess the broad objectives Americans believed they were pursuing in Vietnam. The other is an effort to explain How and why policymakers made the specific decisions that led to the American commitment.
The Defense Department film offered one answer to the question of America's broad objectives: the United States was fighting in Vietnam to defend freedom and stop aggression and to prevent the spread of communism. This explanation continued to attract support well after the war ended. Political scientist Guenter Lewy contended, in America in Vietnam (1978), that the United States entered Vietnam to help an ally combat "foreign aggression." Historian Ernest R. May stated: "The paradox is that the Vietnam War, so often condemned by its opponents as hideously immoral, may well have been the most moral or at least the most selfless war in all of American history. For the impulse guiding it was not to defeat an enemy or to serve a national interest; it was simply not to abandon friends."
Other scholars have taken a starkly different view. They see America's intervention in Vietnam as a form of imperialism—part of a larger effort by the United States after World War II to impose a particular political and economic order on the world. "The Vietnam War," historian Gabriel Kolko wrote in Anatomy of a War (1985), "was for the United States the culmination of its frustrating postwar effort to merge its arms and politics to halt and reverse the emergence of states and
the whole 200 years of its history/' Yet at first, the Vietnam War seemed simply one more Third World struggle on the periphery of the Cold War, a struggle in which the United States would try to tip the balance against communism without becoming too deeply or directly engaged. No single president really "decided” to go to war in Vietnam. Rather, the American involvement there emerged from years of gradually increasing commitments that slowly and almost imperceptibly expanded.
The First Indochina War
Vietnam had a long history both as an independent kingdom and a major power in its region, and as a subjugated province of China. In the mid-nineteenth century, Vietnam became a colony of France. And like other European possessions in Asia, it fell under the control of Japan during World War II. After the defeat of Japan, the question arose of what was to happen to Vietnam in the postwar world. There were two opposing forces attempting
to answer that question, both of them appealing to the United States for help. The French wanted to reassert their colonial control over Vietnam. Challenging them was a powerful nationalist The Vietminh movement within Vietnam committed to creating an independent country. The nationalists were organized into a political party, the Vietminh, which had been created in 1941 and led ever since by Ho Chi Minh, a communist educated in Paris and Moscow, and a fervent
Vietnamese nationalist. In the fall of 1945, after the collapse of Japan and before the Western powers had time to return, the Vietminh declared Vietnam an independent nation and set up a nationalist government under Ho Chi Minh in Hanoi.
President Truman was under heavy pressure from both the British and the French to support France in its effort to reassert its control over Vietnam. The French argued that without Vietnam, their domestic economy would collapse. And since the economic revival of Western Europe was quickly becoming one of the Truman administration's top priorities, the
794
social systems opposed to the international order Washington sought to establish.” Marilyn Younq, in The Vietnam Wars, 1945-1990 (1991), argued that the United States intervened in Vietnam as part of a broad and continuing effort to organize the post-World War II world along lines compati-ble with American interests and ideals.
Those who looked less at the nation's broad objectives than at the internal workings of the policymaking process likewise produced competing explanations. Journalist David Halberstam's The Best and the Brightest (1972) argued that policymakers deluded themselves into thinking they could achieve their goals in Vietnam by ignoring, suppressing, or dismissing the information that might have suggested otherwise. The foreign policy leaders of the Kennedy and Johnson administrations were so committed to the idea of American activism and success that they refused to consider the possibility of failure, the Vietnam disaster was thus, at least in part, a result of the arrogance of the nation's leaders.
Larry Berman offered a somewhat different view in Planning a Tragedy (1982) and Lyndon Johnson's War (1989). Berman argued that Johnson committed American troops to the war in Vietnam in 1965 not because he expected to win (in fact, he never believed that a real victory was within sight), but because he feared that allowing Vietnam to fall would ruin him politically. To do otherwise, Johnson feared, would destroy his hopes for winning approval of his Great Society legislation at home.
Leslie H. Gelb and Richard K. Betts saw the roots of the involvement in the larger imperatives of the American foreign policy system. In The Irony of Vietnam: The System Worked (1979), they argued that intervention in Vietnam was the logical, perhaps even inevitable, result of a political and bureaucratic order shaped by the doctrine of containment. American foreign policy operated in response to a single, overriding imperative: the need to prevent the expansion of communism. Only when the national and international political situation had shifted to the point where it was possible for American policymakers to reassess the costs of the commitment (a shift that began to occur in the early 1970s) was it possible for the United States to begin disengaging.
More-recent studies have questioned the idea that intervention was inevitable or that there were no viable alternatives. David Kaiser, in American Tragedy (2000), argues that John Kennedy was not a hawkish supporter of escalation. Rather, his skepticism about the judgment of his military advisers had led him to believe that the United States should find a negotiated settlement to the war. His successor, Lyndon Johnson, harbored no such skepticism and sided with those who favored a military solution. The death of John Kennedy, therefore, becomes a vital event in the history of America in Vietnam. Fredrik Logevall, in Choosing War: The Lost Chance for Peace and the Escalation of the War in Vietnam (1999), argues that there were significant opportunities for a negotiated settlement of the war in the early 1960s, but that American leaders (including both Kennedy and Johnson) chose a military response instead—in part to protect themselves politically from charges of weakness.
That the debate over the Vietnam War has been so continuous over the past few decades is a reflection of the enormous role the U.S. failure there has played in shaping the way Americans have thought about politics and policy ever since. Because the "lessons of Vietnam remain a subject of intense popular concern, the debate over the history of Vietnam is likely to continue. •
(© Leif Skoogfors/Corbis)
UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE, AND EVALUATE
1.	What was the official government explanation for U.S. involvement in Vietnam?
2.	Some scholars offer explanations that differ significantly from the government view. According to these scholars, why was the United States fighting in Vietnam?
3.	What are the "lessons of Vietnam”? How have U.S. foreign affairs since Vietnam observed—or ignored—these lessons?
United States did nothing to stop the French as they moved back into Vietnam in 1946 and began a struggle with the Vietminh to reestablish control over the country.
For the next four years, during what has become known as the First Indochina War, Truman and then Eisenhower supported the French military campaign against the Vietminh; by 1954, by some calculations, the United States was paying 80 percent of France’s war costs. But the war went badly for the French in spite of the American support. Finally, late in 1953, Vietminh forces engaged the French in a major battle in the far northwest corner of the country, at Dien Bien Phu, an isolated and almost indefensible site. The French were surrounded, and the battle turned into a prolonged and horrible siege, with the French position steadily deteriorating. It was at this point that the Eisenhower administration decided not to intervene to save the French (see p. 776). The defense of Dien Bien Phu collapsed and the French government decided the time had come to get out. The First Indochina War had come to an end.
Geneva and the Two Vietnams
Geneva
Conference
An international conference at Geneva, planned many months before to settle the Korean dispute and other controversies, now took up the fate of Vietnam as well. The Geneva Conference produced an agreement to end the Vietnam conflict without
American participation. There would be an immediate cease-fire in the war; Vietnam would be temporarily partitioned along the 17th parallel, with the Vietminh in control of North Vietnam and a pro-Western regime in control of the South. In 1956, elections would be held to reunite the country under a single government.
America and Diem
As soon as the Geneva accords established the partition, the French finally left Vietnam. The United States almost immediately stepped into the vacuum and became the principal
795
796 • CHAPTER 29
Ngo Dinh Diem
The NLF
benefactor of the new government in the South, led by Ngo Dinh Diem. Diem was an aristocratic Catholic from central Vietnam, an outsider in the South. But he was also a nationalist, uncontaminated by collaboration with the French. And he was,
for a time, successful. With the help of the American CIA, Diem waged an effective campaign against some of the powerful religious sects and the South Vietnamese mafia, which had challenged the authority of the central government. As a result, the United States came to regard Diem as a powerful and impressive alternative to Ho Chi Minh. Lyndon Johnson once called him the "Churchill of Southeast Asia.”
The U.S. government supported South Vietnamese President Diem’s refusal in 1956 to permit the elections called for by the Geneva accords (see above), reasoning, correctly, that Ho Chi Minh would easily win any such election. Ho could count on almost 100 percent of the vote in the north, with its much larger population, and at least some support in the south. In the meantime, the United States poured military and economic aid into South Vietnam. By 1956, it was the second largest recipient of American military aid in the world, after Korea.
Diem’s early successes in suppressing the sects in Vietnam led him in 1959 to begin a similar campaign to eliminate the Vietminh supporters who had stayed behind in the south after the partition. He was quite successful for a time, so successful, in fact, that the North Vietnamese found it necessary to respond. Ho Chi Minh resumed
his armed struggle for national unification. In 1959, the Vietminh cadres in the south created the National Liberation Front (NLF), known to many Americans as the Viet Cong-an organization closely allied with the North Vietnamese government. It was committed to overthrowing the "puppet regime” of Diem and reuniting the nation. In 1960, under orders from Hanoi, and with both material and manpower support from North Vietnam, the NLF began military operations in the South.
By 1961, NLF forces were very successfully destabilizing the Diem regime. They were killing more than 4,000 government officials a year (mostly village leaders) and establishing effective control over many areas of the countryside. Diem was also by now losing the support of many other groups in South Vietnam, and he was even losing support within his own military. In 1963, the Diem regime precipitated a major crisis by trying to discipline and repress the South Vietnamese Buddhists in an effort to make Catholicism the dominant religion of the country. The Buddhists began to stage enormous antigovernment demonstrations. Several Buddhist monks doused themselves with gasoline, sat cross-legged in the streets of downtown Saigon, and set themselves on fire-in view of photographers and television cameras.
The Buddhist crisis caused the U.S. government to reconsider its commitment to Diem-although not to the survival of Diem	South Vietnam. American officials pressured
Overthrown Diem to reform his government, but Diem
made no significant concessions. In the fall
of 1963, Kennedy gave his tacit approval to a plot by a group of
South Vietnamese generals to topple Diem. In early November
1963, the generals staged the coup, assassinated Diem and his
brother and principal adviser, Ngo Dinh Nhu (murders the United States had not wanted or expected), and established the first of a series of new governments, which were, for over three years, even less stable than the one they had overthrown. A few weeks after the coup, John Kennedy too was dead.
From Aid to Intervention
Lyndon Johnson thus inherited what was already a substantial American commitment to the survival of an anticommunist South Vietnam. During his first two years in office, he expanded that commitment into a full-scale American war. Why he did so has long been a subject of debate (see "Debating the Past,” pp. 794-795).
Many factors played a role in Johnson’s decision. But the
most obvious explanation is that the new president faced many
pressures to expand the American involvement and very few to
limit it. As the untested successor to a revered and martyred
president, he felt obliged to prove his worthiness for the office
by continuing the policies of his predeces-Pressure for j	i
American sor‘ I°^nson a^so necessarYt0 retain in Intervention his administration many of the important figures of the Kennedy years. In doing so, he surrounded himself with a group of foreign policy advisers-Secretary of State Dean Rusk, Secretary of Defense Robert McNamara, National Security Adviser McGeorge Bundy, and others-who firmly believed that the United States had an obligation to resist communism in Vietnam. Congress raised little protest to, and indeed at one point openly endorsed, Johnson’s
use of executive powers to lead the nation into war.
Above all, intervention in South Vietnam was fully consistent with nearly twenty years of American foreign policy. An anticommunist ally was appealing to the United States for assistance; all the assumptions of the containment doctrine, as it had come to be defined by the 1960s, seemed to require the nation to intervene. Vietnam, Johnson believed, was a test of American willingness to fight communist aggression, a test he was determined not to fail.
During his first months in office, Johnson expanded the American involvement in Vietnam only slightly, sending an additional 5,000 military advisers there and preparing to send 5,000 more. Then, early in August 1964, the president announced that American destroyers on patrol in international waters in the Gulf Gulf of	tonkin had been attacked by North
Tonkin	Vietnamese torpedo boats. Later information
Resolution raised doubts as to whether the administration reported the attacks accurately. At the time, however, virtually no one questioned Johnson’s portrayal of the incident as a serious act of aggression, or his insistence that the United States must respond. By a vote of 416 to 0 in the House and 88 to 2 in the Senate, Congress hurriedly passed the Gulf of Tonkin Resolution, which authorized the president to "take all necessary measures” to protect American forces and "prevent further aggression” in Southeast Asia. The resolution became, in Johnson’s view at least, an open-ended legal authori-
zation for escalation of the conflict.
CIVIL RIGHTS, VIETNAM, AND THE ORDEAL OF LIBERALISM
» 797 Partition Line 1954 DMZ (Demilitarized Zone)
Da Nang
CAMBODIA
Barrambang
\	\ Tonic
Pursat*
Hoi An
l^Chulai •f-My Lai
Dak To
South
China
Sea
(.all
of If i o i IH II ll
Phnom Per 1 ^0—U.S. and South Vietnam troops entered Viet CoM strongholds insiftetambodia « 4 "
lotrkyftfe Vx
Ouang Ngai
*Kon Turn 1,
H e Anfyie
•pleiku * r CENTRAL HIGHLANDS
\ Qui Nhon
SOUTH x VIETNAM^-
jjfNha Trang
J^jCamranh Bay Da Lat jphanrang
U.S. bases
U.S. and South Vietnam invasion of Cambodia
Ho Chi Minh Trail (communist supply route) |
THE WAR IN VIETNAM AND INDOCHINA, 1964-1975
Much of the Vietnam War was fought in small engagements in widely scattered areas and did not conform to traditional notions of combat. But as this map shows, there were traditional battles and invasions and supply routes as well. The red arrows in the middle of the map show the general path of the Ho Chi Minh Trail, the main supply route by which North Vietnam supplied its troops and allies in the South. The blue arrow in southern South Vietnam indicates the point at which American troops invaded Cambodia in 1970. ® What is there in the geography of Indochina, as presented on this map, that helps to explain the great difficulty the American military had in securing South Vietnam against communist attacks?

With the South Vietnamese leadership still in disarray,	Four months later, the president finally admitted that the
more and more of the burden of opposition to the Viet Cong	character of the war had changed. American soldiers would
fell on the United States. In February 1965, seven marines died	now, he announced, begin playing an active combat role in the
when communist forces attacked an American military base at	conflict. By the end of the year, there were more than 180,000
Pleiku. Johnson retaliated by ordering the first American	American combat troops in Vietnam; in
bombings of the north since the 1964 Tonkin crisis in an	Casualties 1966, that number doubled; and by the end
attempt to destroy the depots and transportation lines respon-	of 1967, over 500,000 American soldiers
sible for the flow of North Vietnamese soldiers and supplies	were there-along with a considerable number of civilian per-
into South Vietnam. The bombing continued intermittently	sonnel working in various capacities. In the meantime, the air
until 1972. A month later, in March 1965, two battalions of	war intensified; ultimately the tonnage of bombs dropped on
American marines landed at Da Nang in South Vietnam. There	North Vietnam would exceed that in all theaters during World
were now more than 100,000 American troops in Vietnam.	War II. And American casualties were mounting. In 1961, 14
I


The Folk-Music Revival
impulses of the 1960s—the renewed interest among young people in the politics of the left, and the search for an "authentic" alternative to what many considered the artificial, consumerist culture of modern America—helped produce the revived popularity of folk music in that turbulent era. Although the harder, harsher, and more sensual music of rock 'n' roll was more visible and more popular in the 1960s, folk music more clearly expressed many of the political
ideas and aspirations that were welling up in the youth culture of the time.
The folk-music tradition, like most American musical traditions, had many roots. It drew from
some of the black musical traditions of the South, and from the white country music of Appalachia. And it drew most immediately from a style of music developed by musicians associated with the Communist Party's Popular Front in the 1930s. Woody Guthrie, Pete Seeger, the Weavers, and others whose music would become popular again in the 1960s began their careers singing in Popular Front and union rallies during the Great Depression. Their music, like the Popular Front itself, set out to seem entirely American, rooted in the nation's folk traditions.
Folk music remained alive in the 1940s and 1950s, but it had only a modest popular following. Pete Seeger and the Weavers continued to perform and to attract attention on college campuses. Harry Belafonte and the Kingston Trio recorded slick, pop versions of folk songs in an effort to bring them to mass audiences. In 1952, Folkway Records released the Anthology of American Folk Music, a collection of eighty-four performances recorded in the 1920s and 1930s that became an inspiration and an important source of material to many younger folk musicians. Folk-music festivals—at Berkeley, Newport, and Chicago—began to proliferate beginning in 1959. And an important community of folk musicians lived and performed together in the 1950s and early 1960s in New York City's Greenwich Village.
As the politics of the 1960s became more heated, and as young people in particular became politically aroused, it was folk music that most directly reflected their new values and concerns. Peter, Paul, and Mary—although only intermittently political—became icons to much of the New Left, beginning with their 1962 recording of "If I Had a Hammer," a song first performed at Communist Party rallies in the 1940s by Pete Seeger and the Weavers. Bob Dylan, whose own politics were never wholly clear to the public, had a large impact on the 1960s left, even inadvertently providing a name to the most radical offshoot of Students for a Democratic Society (SDS), the Weathermen, who named themselves after a line from one of his songs: "You don't need a weatherman to know which way the wind blows."* Joan Baez, whose politics were no secret to anyone, was actively engaged in the antiwar movement and was arrested several times for participating in militant protests.
RALLYING AGAIN
The music of Woody Guthrie and other musicians of the 1930s, 1940s and 1950s inspired a revival of popular music sympathetic to the protesting generation of the 1960s. (© Everett Collection Inc./Alamy) But it was not just the overt political messages of folk musicians that made them so important to young Americans in the 1960s. In addition, folk was a kind of music that seemed to reflect the "authenticity" the youth culture was attempting to find. In truth, neither the musicians themselves nor the young Americans attracted to them had much real connection with the traditions they were trying to evoke. The audiences for folk
Americans had died in Vietnam. By the spring of 1966, more than 4,000 Americans had been killed.
The United States finally succeeded in 1965 in creating a reasonably stable government in the south under General Nguyen Van Thieu. But the new regime was hardly less corrupt or brutal than its predecessors, and no more able than they to establish its authority in its own countryside. The Viet Cong, not the Thieu regime, controlled the majority of South Vietnam’s villages and hamlets.
The Quagmire
Strategy of "Attrition”
unable and unwilling to continue the struggle. But the attrition strategy failed because the North Vietnamese proved willing to commit many more soldiers to the conflict than the United States had expected. The United States relied heavily on its bombing of the north to eliminate the communists’ war-making capacity. By the end of 1967, most of the identifiable targets of any strategic importance in North Vietnam had been destroyed. But the bombing had produced none of the effects that the United States had expected. North Vietnam was not a modern, industrial society; it had few of the sorts of targets against which bombing is effective. The North Vietnamese responded to the air raids with ingenuity: They created a great network of underground tunnels, shops, and factories. They also secured increased aid from the Soviet Union and China. Infiltration of the south was unaffected; the North Vietnamese kept moving the Ho Chi Minh Trail, the routes by which North Vietnam soldiers infiltrated the South.
798
Central to the American war effort was a commitment to
what the military called "attrition,” a strategy premised on the
belief that the United States could inflict
so many casualties and so much damage on
the enemy that eventually they would be
COFFEEHOUSE MUSIC
The Feejon Coffee House in Manhattan was popular among young writers, poets, and others in the late 1950s, in part because it was a gathering place for folk musicians, two of whom are shown here performing at right. j© John Orris/Getty images)
music—a product of rural and working-class traditions—were overwhelmingly urban, middle-class people. But the message of folk music—that there is a "real'' America rooted in values of sharing and community, hidden beneath the crass commercialism of modern culture—resonated with the yearnings of many people in the 1960s (and beyond) for an alternative to their own troubled world. When young audiences responded to Woody Guthrie's famous ballad "This Land Is Your Land," they were expressing a hope for a different America—more democratic, more honest, and more natural than the land they knew. •
*Bob Dylan, "Subterranean Homesick Blues." Copyright © 1965 by Warner Bros. Music. Copyright renewed 1993 by Special Rider Music. All rights reserved. International copyright secured. Reprinted by permission.
PETE SEEGER
Pete Seeger was one of several folk musicians who provided a link between the Popular Front-labor movement folk music of the 1930s and the folk revival of the 1960s. He is shown here in concert in 1966. (© Archive Photos/Getty Images)
UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE, AND EVALUATE
1.	What did folk music, with roots in the musical traditions of blacks, rural folk, and working-class people, offer that made it so appealing to and popular with urban, middle-class audiences?
2.	What similarities between the 1930s and the 1960s might help explain the popularity of folk music during both those decades?
3.	What musical style or form today continues the folk music tradition of expressing a political message and reflecting the search for "authenticity"?
Another crucial part of the American strategy was the "pacifi-ation" program, which was intended to push the Viet Cong from
"Hearts and Minds”
areas chosen by the United States and then "pacify” those regions by winning the "hearts and minds” of the people. But American ces were not adept at establishing the kind of rapport with Jvincial Vietnamese that the Viet Cong had created.
Gradually, the pacification program gave way to a heavy-Jded relocation strategy, through which American troops rooted villagers from their homes, sent them fleeing to ugee camps or into the cities (producing by 1967 more than Trillion refugees), and then destroyed the vacated villages i surrounding countryside. But the Viet Cong responded by iying to new sanctuaries elsewhere. The futility of the ited States’s effort was suggested by the statement of an ferican officer after flattening one such hamlet that it had -n "necessary to destroy [the village] in order to save it.”
As the war dragged on and victory remained elusive, some American officers and officials began to urge the president to expand the military efforts. The Johnson administration, however, resisted. Unwilling to abandon its commitment to South Vietnam for fear of destroying American "credibility” in the world, the government was also unwilling to expand the war too far, for fear of provoking direct intervention by the Chinese, the Soviets, or both. In the meantime, the president began to encounter additional obstacles and frustrations at home.
The War at Home
As late as the end of 1965, few Americans, and even fewer influential ones, had protested the American involvement in Vietnam. But as the war dragged on, political support for it began to erode. A series of "teach-ins” on university campuses, beginning at the University of Michigan in 1965, sparked a national debate over
799
800 • CHAPTER 29
SEARCH AND DESTROY U.S.
troops in Vietnam, often unable to distinguish enemy forces from the civilian population, increasingly sought to destroy places they considered possible enemy sanctuaries. Here an American soldier watches the burning of a village, one of many that U.S. troops destroyed. (© Topham/The Image Works) the war. By the end of 1967, American students opposed to the war had become a significant political force. Enormous peace
_	marches in New York, Washington, D.C., and
Growing	,	. .	,	,	,	,
Opposition to other cities drew broad public attention to
the War the antiwar movement. Opposition to the war became a central issue in left-wing politics and in the culture of colleges and universities. It had penetrated popular cultures as well-most visibly in the rising popularity of folk musicians, many of whom used their songs to express opposition to the war. In the meantime, a growing number of journalists, particularly reporters who had spent time in Vietnam, helped sustain the antiwar movement with their frank revelations about the brutality and apparent futility of the war. The growing chorus of popular protest soon began to stimulate
opposition to the war from within the government.
Senator J. William Fulbright of Arkansas, chairman of the powerful Senate Foreign Relations Committee, turned against the war and in January 1966 began to stage highly publicized congressional hearings to air criticisms of it. Distinguished figures such as George F. Kennan and retired general James Gavin testified against the conflict, giving opposition to the war greater respectability. Other members of Congress joined Fulbright in
opposing Johnson’s policies-including, in 1967, Robert F. Kennedy, brother of the slain president and now a senator from New York. Even within the administration, the consensus seemed to be crumbling. Robert McNamara, who had done much to help extend the American involvement in Vietnam, quietly left the government, disillusioned, in 1968. His successor as secretary of defense, Clark Clifford, became a quiet but powerful voice within the administration on behalf of a cautious scaling down of the commitment in troops and funding.
In the meantime, the American economy was beginning to suffer. Johnson’s commitment to fighting the war while continuing his Great Society reforms—his promise of "guns and War-Induced butter”-proved impossible to maintain.
Inflation Tbe in^ation rate, which had remained at 2 percent through most of the early 1960s, rose to 3 percent in 1967, 4 percent in 1968, and 6 percent in 1969. In August 1967, Johnson asked Congress for a tax increase-a 10 percent surcharge that was widely labeled a war tax”—which he knew was necessary if the nation was to avoid even more ruinous inflation. In return, congressional conservatives demanded and received a $6 billion reduction in
the funding for Great Society programs.
CIVIL RIGHTS, VIETNAM, AND THE ORDEAL OF LIBERALISM
• 801 THE TRAUMAS OF 1968
By the end of 1967, the twin crises of the war in Vietnam and the deteriorating racial situation at home-crises that fed upon and inflamed each other-had produced profound social and political tensions. In the course of 1968, those tensions seemed suddenly to burst to the surface and to threaten the nation with genuine chaos.
The Tet Offensive
On January 31, 1968, the first day of the Vietnamese New Year (Tet), communist forces launched an enormous, concerted attack on American strongholds throughout South Vietnam. A few cities fell to the communists. During their occupation of the provincial capital, Hue, the communist forces rounded up supporters of the Saigon regime and massacred them. Other cities suffered major disruptions.
Americans saw vivid reports on television of communist forces in the heart of Saigon, setting off bombs, shooting South Vietnamese officials and troops, and holding down fortified
Political and Psychological Defeat
areas (including, briefly, the grounds of the American embassy). Such images shocked many Americans and proved devastating to popular support for the war. The Tet offensive also suggested to the American public something of the brutality of the struggle in Vietnam. In the midst of the fighting, television cameras recorded the sight of a captured Viet Cong soldier being led up to a South Vietnamese officer in the streets of Saigon. Without a word, the officer pulled out his pistol and shot the young man in the head, leaving him lying dead in the street. Few single events did more to galvanize support for the war in the United States.
American forces soon dislodged the Viet Cong from most of the positions they had seized, and the Tet offensive in the end cost the communists such appalling casualties that they were significantly weakened for months to come. The Tet defeats permanently depleted the ranks of the NLF and forced North Vietnamese troops to take on a
much larger share of the subsequent fighting. Tet may have been a military victory for the United States, but it was a political defeat for the administration.
p were exposed. (© Image Asset Management Ltd./Alamy)
1968
IT! IT
TJyear 1968 was one of the most turbulent in the postwar history of the United States. 1 11 JLji Much of what caused these upheavals was specifically American events—the growing controversy over the war in Vietnam, the assassinations of Martin Luther King Jr. and Robert Kennedy, racial unrest in the nation's cities, student protests on campuses throughout America. But the turmoil of 1968 was not confined to the United States. There were tremendous upheavals in many parts of the world that year.
PRAGUE SPRING
Czech demonstrators march through Wenceslas Square in Prague following a radio address by their reform president, Alexander Dubcek, in August 1968. By this time, the great hopes awakened by Dubcek's reforms during the "Prague Spring” of several months ago had been crushed by Soviet pressure, including the arrival of Soviet tanks in the streets of Prague. These demonstrators are demanding the "brutal truth" from their leaders about the price Czechoslovakia paid to keep Dubcek in power. (© Bettmann/Corbis) The most common form of turbulence around the world in 1968 was student unrest. A student uprising in France in May 1968 far exceeded in size and ferocity anything that occurred in the United States. It attracted the support of French workers, briefly paralyzed Paris and other cities, and contributed to the downfall of the government of Charles de Gaulle a year later. In England, Ireland, Germany, Italy, the Netherlands, Mexico, Canada, Japan, and South Korea, students and other young people also demonstrated in great numbers, sometimes violently, against governments and universities and other structures of authority. In Czechoslovakia, hundreds of thousands of citizens took to the streets in support of what became known as "Prague Spring"—a demand for greater democracy and a repudiation of many of the oppressive rules and structures imposed on the nation by its Soviet-dominated communist regimes—until Russian tanks rolled into the city to crush the uprising.
One factor that contributed to the worldwide turbulence of 1968 was simple numbers. The postwar baby boom, which occurred in many nations, had created a very large age cohort that by the late 1960s was reaching adulthood. The sheer size of the new generation produced a tripling of the number of people attending colleges and universities, and a heightened sense of the power of youth. The long period of postwar prosperity and relative peace in which this generation had grown up contributed to heightened expectations of what the world should offer them—and a greater level of impatience than previous generations had demonstrated with the obstacles that stood in the way of their hopes. A new global youth culture emerged that was in many ways at odds with the dominant culture of older generations. It valued nonconformity, personal freedom, and even rebellion.
A second force contributing to the widespread turbulence of 1968 was the power of global media. Satellite technology introduced in the early 1960s made it
In the following weeks, opposition to the war grew substantially. Leading newspapers and magazines, television commentators, and mainstream politicians began taking public stands in favor of de-escalation of the conflict. Within weeks of the Tet offensive, public opposition to the war had almost doubled. And Johnson's personal popularity rating had slid to 35 percent, the lowest of any president since Harry Truman.
The Political Challenge
Beginning in the summer of 1967, dissident Democrats (led by
the activist Allard Lowenstein) tried to mobilize support
802 •
behind an antiwar candidate who would challenge Lyndon Johnson in the 1968 primaries. When Robert Kennedy declined their invitation, they turned to Senator Eugene McCarthy of Minnesota. A brilliantly orchestrated campaign by Lowenstein and thousands of young volunteers in the New Hampshire primary produced a startling showing by McCarthy in March; he nearly defeated the president.
A few days later, Robert Kennedy entered the campaign, embittering many McCarthy supporters, but bringing his own substantial strength among African Americans, the poor, and workers to the antiwar cause. Polls showed the president trailing badly in the next scheduled primary, in Wisconsin. Indeed,
CIVIL RIGHTS, VIETNAM, AND THE ORDEAL OF LIBERALISM * 803
possible to transmit live news instantly across the world. Videotape technology and the creation of lightweight portable television cameras enabled media organizations to respond to events much more quickly and flexibly than in the past. And the audience for these televised images was by now global and enormous, particularly in industrial nations but even in the poorest areas of the world. Protests in one country were suddenly capable of inspiring protests in others. Demonstrators in Paris, for example, spoke openly of how campus protests in the United States in 1968—for example, the student uprising at Columbia University in New York City—had helped motivate French students to rise up as well. Just as American students were protesting against what they considered the antiquated paternalistic features of their universities, French students demanded an end to the rigid, autocratic character of their own academic world.
In most parts of the world, the 1968 uprisings came and went without fundamentally altering the institutions and systems they were attacking. But many changes came in the wake of these protests. Universities around the globe undertook significant reforms. Religious observance in mainstream churches and synagogues in the West declined dramatically after 1968. New concepts of personal freedom gained legitimacy, helping to inspire new social movements in the years that followed—among them the dramatic growth of feminism in many parts of the world. The events of 1968 did not produce a revolution, in the United States or in most of the rest of the world, but they did help launch a period of dramatic social, cultural, and political change that affected the peoples of many nations. •
UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE, AND EVALUATE
1.	What factors combined to produce the turbulence that resulted in the uprisings of 1968?
2.	Did the demonstrators of 1968 succeed or fail to achieve their objectives? What were the long-term effects of the 1968 uprisings?
3.	Has there been a year or period since 1968 in which similar worldwide protests and uprisings have occurred? If so, what events triggered these later demonstrations?
public animosity toward the president was now so intense that Johnson did not even dare leave the White House to campaign. On March 31, Johnson went on television to announce a limited halt in the bombing of North
Robert	Vietnam-his first major concession to the
antiwar forces-and, more surprising, his
not by popular primaries but by state party organizations. He soon appeared to be the front-runner in the race.
The King and Kennedy Assassinations
In the midst of this bitter political battle, in which the war had been the dominant issue, attention suddenly turned back to the nation’s bitter racial conflicts. On April 4, Martin Luther King Jr., who had traveled to Memphis, Tennessee, to lend his support to striking black sanitation workers in the city, was shot and killed while standing on the balcony of his motel. The presumed assassin, James Earl Ray, who was captured days later in London and eventually convicted, had no apparent motive. Later evidence suggested that he had been hired by others to do the killing, but he never revealed the identity of his employers.
King’s tragic death produced an outpouring of grief matched in recent memory only by the reaction to the death of John Riots	Kennedy. Among African Americans, it also
produced anger. In the days after the assassination, major riots broke out in more than sixty American cities. Forty-three people died; more than 3,000 suffered inju-
ries; as many as 27,000 people were arrested.
For two months following the death of King, Robert Kennedy continued his campaign for the presidential nomination. Late on the night of June 6, he appeared in the ballroom of a Los Angeles hotel to acknowledge his victory in that day’s California primary. As he left the ballroom after his victory statement, Sirhan Sirhan, a young Palestinian apparently enraged by pro-Israeli remarks Kennedy had recently made, emerged from a crowd and shot him in the head. Early the next morning, Kennedy died.
By the time of his death, Robert Kennedy-who earlier in his career had been widely considered a cold, ruthless agent of his more appealing brother-had emerged
Legacy” as a ^Rure 0 enormous popular appeal.
More than John Kennedy, Robert identified his hopes with the American "underclass” with blacks, Hispanics, Native Americans, the poor. Indeed, Robert Kennedy, much more than John, shaped what some would later call the "Kennedy legacy,” a set of ideas that would for a time become central to American liberalism: the fervent commitment to using government to help the powerless. The passions Kennedy aroused made his violent death a particu-
larly shattering experience for many Americans.
The presidential campaign continued gloomily during the
last weeks before the convention. Hubert Humphrey, who had seemed likely to win the nomination even before Robert Kennedy’s death, now faced only minor opposition. The approaching Democratic National Convention, therefore, began to take on the appearance of an exercise in futility; and antiwar activists, despairing of winning any victories within the convention, began to plan major demonstrations outside it.
When the Democrats finally gathered in Chicago in August, even the most optimistic observers were predicting a turbulent convention. Inside the hall, delegates bitterly debated an
withdrawal from the presidential contest.
Robert Kennedy quickly established himself as the cham-
pion of the Democratic primaries. In the meantime, however,
Vice President Hubert Humphrey, with the support of President
Johnson, entered the contest and began to attract the support
of party leaders and of the many delegations that were selected
804 • CHAPTER 29
Democratic antiwar plank in the party platform that National both Kennedy and McCarthy supporters
Convention favored. Miles away, in a downtown park, thousands of antiwar protesters were staging demonstrations. On the third night of the convention, as the delegates were beginning their balloting on the now inevitable nomination of Hubert Humphrey, demonstrators and police clashed in a bloody riot in the streets of Chicago. Hundreds of protesters were injured as police attempted to disperse them with tear gas and billy clubs. Aware that the violence was being televised, the demonstrators taunted the authorities with the chant, "The whole world is watching!” And Hubert Humphrey, who had spent years dreaming of becoming his party’s candidate for president, received a nomi-
nation that appeared at the time to be almost worthless.
The Conservative Response
The turbulent events of 1968 persuaded many observers that American society was in the throes of revolutionary change. In
CHICAGO, 1968 Demonstrators climb on a statue in a Chicago park during the 1968 Democratic National Convention, protesting both the Vietnam War and the harsh treatment they had received from Mayor Richard Daley's Chicago police. (© Dennis Brack/Black Star)
fact, however, the response of most Americans to the turmoil was a conservative one.
The most visible sign of the conservative backlash was the surprising success of the campaign of the segregationist Alabama governor George Wallace for the presidency. In 1964, he had run in a few Democratic presidential primaries and had done surprisingly well, even in several states outside the South. In 1968, he became a third-party candidate for president, basing his campaign on a host of conservative grievances, not all of them connected to race. He denounced the forced busing of students, the proliferation of government
regulations and social programs, and the permissiveness of authorities toward race riots and antiwar demonstrations. There was never any serious chance that Wallace would win the election; but his standing in the polls at times rose to over 20 percent.
A more effective effort to mobilize the "silent majority” in favor of order and stability was under way within the Republican Party. Richard Nixon, whose political career had seemed at an end after his losses in the presidential race of 1960 and a California gubernatorial campaign two years later,
George
Wallace
Candidate (Party)
Electoral Vote Popular Vote (%)
Richard M. Nixon (Republican)
Hubert H. Humphrey (Democratic)
George C. Wallace (American Independence)
301
191
46
Other candidates (Prohibition; Socialist Labor; D. Gregory; Socialist Workers; Peace and Freedom; McCarthy)
60.6% of electorate voting
31,770,237
(43.4)
31,270,533
(42.3)
9,906,141
(12.9)
218,347
THE ELECTION OF 1968
The 1968 presidential election, which Richard Nixon won, was almost as close as the election of 1960, which he had lost. Nixon might have won a more su stantia victory had it not been for the independent candidacy of Governor George C. a ace, w o attracted many of the same conservative voters to whom Nixon appealed.
* How does the distribution of Democratic and Republicanltrenqth7n this election compare to that in 1960?
CIVIL RIGHTS, VIETNAM, AND THE ORDEAL OF LIBERALISM
• 805 reemerged as the preeminent spokesman for what he called "Middle America/’ Nixon recognized that many Americans were tired of hearing about their obligations to the poor, tired of hearing about the sacrifices necessary to achieve racial jus-tice, tired of judicial reforms that seemed designed to help criminals. By offering a vision of stability, law and order, government retrenchment, and peace with honor” in Vietnam, he easily captured the Republican presidential nomination. And after the spectacle of the Democratic National Convention, he enjoyed a commanding lead in the polls as the November election approached.
That lead diminished greatly in the last weeks before the voting. Old doubts about Nixon’s character continued to haunt the Republican candidate. A skillful last-minute surge by Hubert Humphrey, who managed to restore a tenuous unity to
the Democratic Party, narrowed the gap further. And the Wallace campaign appeared to be hurting the Republicans more than the Democrats. In the end, however, Nixon eked out a victory almost as narrow as his defeat in 1960. He received 43.4 percent of the popular vote to Humphrey’s 42.3 percent (a margin of only about 800,000 votes), and 301 electoral votes to Humphrey’s 191. George Wallace, who like most third-party
XT	candidates faded in the last weeks of the
Nixon
Victorious campaign, still managed to poll 12.9 percent of the popular vote and to carry five southern states with a total of 46 electoral ballots-the best showing by a third-party candidate since the 1920s. Nixon had not won a decisive personal mandate. But the election made clear that a majority of the American electorate was more inter-
ested in restoring stability than in promoting social change.
LOOKING BACK
No decade of the twentieth century created more powerful and enduring images than the 1960s. It began with the election-and then the traumatic assassination-of an attractive and energetic young president, John Kennedy, who captured the imagination of millions and seemed to symbolize the rising idealism of the time. It produced a dramatic period of political innovation, christened the "Great Society” by President Lyndon Johnson, which greatly expanded the size and functions of the federal government and its responsibility for the welfare of the nation’s citizens. It saw the emergence of a sustained and enormously powerful civil rights movement that won a series of important legal victories, including two civil rights acts that dismantled the Jim Crow system constructed in the late nineteenth and early twentieth centuries.
The very spirit of dynamism and optimism that shaped the early 1960s also helped bring to the surface problems and grievances that had no easy solutions. The civil rights movement ended legalized segregation and disenfranchisement, but it also awakened expectations of social and economic equality
that laws alone could not provide. The peaceful, interracial crusade of the early 1960s gradually turned into a much more militant, confrontational, and increasingly separatist movement toward the decade’s end. The idealism among white youths that began the 1960s, and played an important role in the political success of John Kennedy, evolved into an angry rebellion against many aspects of American culture and politics. It produced a large upsurge of student protest that rocked the nation at the decade’s end. Perhaps most of all, a small and largely unnoticed Cold War commitment to defend South Vietnam against communist aggression from the north led to a large and disastrous American military commitment that destroyed the presidency of Lyndon Johnson, shook the faith of millions in their leaders and their political system, sent thousands of young American men to their deaths, and showed no signs of producing a victory. A decade that began with high hopes and soaring ideals ended with ugly and at times violent division, and deep disillusionment.
Key Terms/People/Places/Events
Bay of Pigs 792
Black Power 790
Community Action Program 784 Congress of Racial Equality
(CORE) 786 Cuban missile crisis 793 Dien Bien Phu 795 Freedom rides 786 Freedom summer 787 George Wallace 787
Great Society 784
Gulf of Tonkin resolution 796 Ho Chi Minh 794 Ho Chi Minh trail 798 Immigration Act of 1965 785 John Kennedy 782 Malcolm X 791 March on Washington 787 Medicaid 784 Medicare 784
New Frontier 782
Ngo Dinh Diem 796
Richard Nixon 804
Robert Kennedy 802
Student Nonviolent Coordinating Committee (SNCC) 786
Tet offensive 801
Viet Cong 796
806 ♦ CHAPTER 29
RECALL AND REFLECT
1.	What were the political effects of JFK’s assassination?
2.	How did increasing radicalism affect the successes and the setbacks of the civil rights movement?
3.	What was the military strategy of the United States in Vietnam? What were the U.S. aims in that conflict? Why did the United States ultimately fail in Vietnam?
4.	What accounted for growing opposition to the war in Vietnam?
5.	What events made 1968 such a turbulent year, both in the United States and elsewhere in the world? How did these events affect U.S. politics?
SIGNIFICANT EVENTS
I960
John F. Kennedy elected president Greensboro sit-ins
1962
Cuban missile crisis
1?8* ...............
Gulf of Tonkin Resolution passed
Johnson elected president by record margin Johnson launches war on poverty
"Freedom summer" campaign in Mississippi
Congress passes Civil Rights Act
1966
Medicaid enacted King leads Chicago campaign
1968
Viet Cong launch Tet offensive Johnson withdraws from presidential contest Martin Luther King Jr. assassinated
Racial violence breaks out in American cities Robert Kennedy assassinated Demonstrators clash with police at Democratic National Convention
George Wallace launches third- party presidential campaign
Richard M. Nixon elected president
...............196.1....
Freedom rides
United States supports failed invasion of Bay of Pigs
Berlin Wall erected
1963
Test ban treaty signed
Kennedy assassinated; Lyndon B. Johnson becomes president
March on Washington; King gives "I Have a Dream" speech
1965
American combat troops sent to Vietnam
Medicare enacted
Race riot breaks out in Watts, Los Angeles
Malcolm X assassinated Congress passes Voting Rights
Act
Immigration Reform Act passed
1967
Race riot breaks out in Detroit
Qpl THE CRISIS OF jU AUTHORITY
5 {: ‘ i I
ROBERT KENNEDY THE ICON
This photo and statement from Robert Kennedy date from 1968, the year of his presidential campaign and assassination. Almost immediately after his death, Kennedy became a symbol of a lost era—and he remains a powerful image into our own time. In 2008, the Triborough Bridge in New York City was renamed the RFK Bridge. (© Henry Diltz/Corbis). LOOKING AHEAD
1.	What were some of the characteristics of the social and cultural revolutions of the 1960s and 1970s?
2.	How did the U.S. strategy in Vietnam change under Nixon? What was the result of the change in strategy?
3.	What was the Watergate scandal and how did it affect the presidency?
SETTING THE STAGE
mmimi Hi;mimmmm nnn i uhi iihi i i hi ii iiiiii i nm 111nmii hi iiiihi iiiii 11 uhi mu11 n m u imm; 1111 hiiiiismi it 11 n
THROUGHOUT THE LATE 1960S AND EARLY 1970S,
new movements and interest groups were mobilizing to demand protections and benefits. New values and assumptions were emerging to challenge traditional patterns of thought and behavior. Some Americans welcomed the changes. But others feared them, viewing the new movements as a dangerous assault on the foundations of their society and culture. They looked for a restoration of stability and a relegitimization of traditional centers of authority. In Richard Nixon they found a man who seemed to match their mood. A product of a hardworking, middle-class family, he projected an image of stern dedication to traditional values. Yet the presidency of Richard Nixon, far from returning calm and stability to American politics, coincided with, and helped to produce, more years of crisis.
Several crises were not wholly of Nixon's making. He had inherited both an unpopular war in Vietnam and an economy that was beginning to weaken. By the beginning of his second term, the economy was reeling under rapidly rising energy prices and growing inflation.
One crisis, at least, was directly attributable to Nixon and the people in his administration. An obscure break-in at the Democratic National Committee headquarters in Washington, D.C., in June 1972, hardly noticed at the time, gradually expanded to create one of the most serious crises in the history of the presidency—and the first such crisis to drive a president from office. Having won election by railing against crises of authority that threatened social stability, Nixon left office having created a major crisis of authority himself.
THE YOUTH CULTURE
Perhaps most alarming to conservative Americans in the 1960s and 1970s was a pattern of social and cultural protest that was emerging from younger Americans, who were giving vent to two related impulses. One was the impulse, originating with the political left, to create a great new community of "the people,” which would rise up to break the power of elites and force the nation to end the war, pursue racial and economic justice, and transform its political life. The other,
"Liberation” eQuallY powerful, impulse was the vision of "liberation.” It found expression through the efforts of particular groups-African Americans, Native Americans,
Hispanics, women, gays and lesbians, and others-to define and assert themselves and make demands on the larger society. It also found expression through the efforts of individuals to create a new culture that would allow them to escape from what they considered the dehumanizing pressures of what some called the modern "technocracy.”
"The New Left"
In retrospect, it seems unsurprising that young Americans became so assertive and powerful in American culture and politics in the 1960s. The postwar baby-boom generation-the unprecedented number of people born in a few years just after World War II-was growing up. By 1970, more than half the American population was under thirty years old; more than 8 million Americans-eight times the number in 1950-were attending college. This was the largest generation of youth in American history, and it was coming to maturity in a time of unprecedented affluence, oppor-tunity, and-for many-frustration.
One of the most visible results of the increasingly assertive youth movement was a radicaliza-tion of many American college and university students, who in the 1960s formed what became known as the New Left-a large, diverse group of men and women energized by the polarizing Sources of	develoPments °f their time. The New Left embraced the cause of African
the New Left Americans and other minorities, but its own ranks consisted overwhelmingly °r white Pe°Ple- Blacks and minorities formed political movements of their own. Some members of the New Left were the children of radical parents (members of the
so-called Old Left of the 1930s and 1940s).
808
THE CRISIS OF AUTHORITY . 809
CHE ERNESTO
"Che" Guevara was an Argentine Marxist revolutionary who played a significant role in the Cuban Revolution. His stylized portrait remains a major symbol of countercultural rebellion the world over. (Axiom Photographic/© Design Pics/SuperStock) The New Left drew from the writings of some of the important social critics of the 1950s-among them C. Wright Mills, a sociologist at Columbia University who wrote a series of scathing and brilliant critiques of modern bureaucracies. Relatively few members of the New Left were communists, but many were drawn to the writings of Karl Marx and of contemporary Marxist theorists. Some came to revere Third World Marxists such as Che Guevara, the South American revolutionary and guerrilla leader; Mao Zedong; and Ho Chi Minh. But the New Left drew its inspiration above all from the civil rights movement, in which many idealistic young white Americans had become involved in the early 1960s.
In 1962, a group of students, most of them from prestigious
universities, gathered in Michigan to form an organization to
give VOiCe t0 their demands: StudentS for a
Democratic Society (SDS). Their declara-
tion of beliefs the Port Huron Statement, expressed their
disillusionment with the society they had inherited and their determination to build a new politics.
Some members of SDS moved into inner-city neighborhoods and tried for a time, without great success, to mobilize poor, working-class people politically. But most members of the New Left were students, and their radicalism centered in part on issues related to the modern university. A 1964 dispute at the University of California at Berkeley over the rights of students to engage in political activities on campus gained national „	_	attention. The Free Speech Movement, as it
Movement cailed itself, created turmoil at Berkeley as students challenged campus police, occupied administrative offices, and produced a strike in which nearly three-quarters of the Berkeley students participated. The immediate issue was the right of students to pass out literature and recruit volunteers for political causes on campus. But the protest quickly became as well an expression of a basic critique of the university and the society it
seemed to represent.
The revolt at Berkeley was the first outburst of what was to be nearly a decade of campus turmoil. Students at Berkeley and elsewhere protested the impersonal character of the modern university, and they denounced the role of educational institutions in sustaining what they considered corrupt or immoral public policies. The antiwar movement greatly inflamed the challenge and expanded it to the universities; and beginning in 1968, campus demonstrations, riots, and building seizures became almost commonplace. At Columbia University in New York City, students seized several buildings, including the offices of the president, and occupied them for days until local police forcibly and violently ejected them. Harvard University had a similar, and even more violent, experience a year later.
Also in 1969, Berkeley became the scene of perhaps the most prolonged and traumatic conflict of any American college campus in the 1960s: a battle over the efforts of a few students to build a "People’s Park” on a vacant lot the university planned to use to build a parking garage. This seemingly minor event precipitated weeks of impassioned and often violent conflicts between the university administration, which sought to evict the intruders from the land, and the students, many of whom supported the advocates of the park and who saw the university’s efforts to close it as a symbol of the struggle between liberation and oppression.
By the end of the People’s Park battle, which lasted for over a week, the Berkeley campus was completely polarized; even students who had not initially supported or even noticed the Pfopi f\ Park People’s Park (the great majority) were, by the end, committed to its defense; 85 per-cent of the 15,000 students voted in a referendum to leave the park alone. Student radicals were, for the first time, winning large audiences for their extravagant rhetoric linking university administrators, the police, and the larger political and economic system, describing them all as part of one united,
oppressive force.
Most campus radicals were rarely if ever violent (except at times in their rhetoric). But the popular image of student
1
Rock Music in the Sixties
T,	rock music of the late 1960s and 1970s, even more than the rock 'n' roll of the 1950s
. and early 1960s, emphasized release. It gave vent to impulse and instinct, to physical and emotional urges. That was one reason it was so enormously popular among young people in an age of cultural and sexual revolution, It was also why it seemed so menacing and dangerous to many conservative Americans seeking to defend
iS SUNDAYS NEWS rw,
H	___ MEW YORK'S PICTURE NEWSPAPER«	I I
WOODSTOCK MUSIC & ART FAIR
presents
AN AQUARIAN EXPOSITION
in
WHITE LAKE, N.Y.‘
Joan Baez
Arlo Guthrie Tim Hardin Richie Havens
Incredible String Band
Ravi Shankar Sly And The Family Stone Bert Sommer Sweetwater
FRI.
AUG. 15
WITH
Keef Hartley Canned Heat Creedence Clearwater Grateful Dead Janis Joplin Jefferson Airplane Mountain Guilt Santana The Who
SAT. AUG. 16
The Band Jeff Beck Group Blood, Sweat and Tears Joe Cocker
Crosby, Stills and Nash Jimi Hendrix Iron Butterfly
Ten Years After Johnny Winter
SUN.
AUG. 17
traditional values and behavior.
Rock in the late 1960s seemed simultaneously subversive and liberating. That was partly because of the behavior and lifestyles of rock musicians, whose appearance and behavior were often deliberately outrageous. Rock musicians were connected at times to the drug culture of the 1960s (especially through the so-called psychedelic-rock groups inspired by experiences with the hallucinogen LSD). They had links to mystical Eastern religions (most notably the Beatles, who had spent time in India studying Transcendental Meditation and who, beginning in 1967 with their album Sergeant Pepper's Lonelg Hearts Club Band, incorporated those themes into their music). And they often reveled in flouting social conventions, beginning with the Rolling Stones and culminating, perhaps, in the extreme and self-destructive behavior of Jimi Hendrix, Jim Morrison, and Janis Joplin, all of whom died very young of drug-related causes.
Late-sixties rock was among many expressions of the impulses that came to be known as the counterculture; and like the counterculture, it inspired widely varying reactions. To its
HIPPIES MIRED IN SEA OF MUD
AH ptoqtaHis subject lo change without notice • White Lake. Town ot Bethel. Sullivan County, N.Y.
ADVERTISING WOODSTOCK
Even before the thousands of spectators gathered for the famous rock concert at Woodstock in 1969, organizers envisioned it as something more than a performance. It would, this poster claims, be a search for peace as well as for music. (© Hulton Archive/Getty Images) REPORTING WOODSTOCK
The New York Daily News, whose largely working-class readership was not notably sympathetic toward the young people at Woodstock, ran this slightly derisive front-page story on the concert as heavy rains turned the concert site into a sea of mud. [“They Don’t Melt," the caption said.] (© New York Daily News/Getty Images)
defenders, the new rock, with its emphasis on emotional release, was a healthy rebuke to the repressive norms of mainstream culture. To them, its virtues were symbolized by the great rock festival at Woodstock, New York, in August 1969, where over 400,000 young people gathered on a remote piece of farmland for several days to hear performances by such artists as the Who, Jimi Hendrix, the Grateful Dead, Janis Joplin, Joe Cocker, the Jefferson Airplane, and many others. The festival was
radicalism in mainstream culture was one of chaos and disorder, based in part on the disruptive actions of small groups of militants, among them the "Weathermen,” a violent offshoot of SDS. The Weathermen were responsible for several cases of arson and bombing that destroyed campus buildings and claimed several lives. Not many people, not even many students, ever accepted the most radical political views that lay at the heart of the New Left. But many supported the position of SDS and other groups on particular issues and, above all, on the Vietnam War. Student activists tried to drive out training programs for military officers (ROTC) and bar military
810 •
recruiters from college campuses. They attacked the laboratories and corporations that were producing weapons for the war. And between 1967 and 1969, they organized some of the largest political demonstrations in American history. The October 1967 march on the Pentagon, where demonstrators were met by a solid line of armed troops; the "spring mobilization” of April 1968, which attracted hundreds of thousands of demonstrators in cities around the country; the Vietnam "moratorium” of the fall of 1969, during which millions of opponents of the war gathered in major rallies across the nation; and countless other demonstrations, large and

ALTAMONT
Hell’s Angels "security guards” club a spectator near the stage during the rock concert at Altamont as other concertgoers—some curious, some aghast—watch. One spectator died as a result of the beatings. (© Photofest) end the cold war he has borne / against his own kind of flesh." The festival and its music, many claimed, had shown the path to an age of love and peace and justice. Altamont, however, suggested a dark underside of the rock culture, its potential for destruction and violence. "As far as I was concerned," one participant said, "Altamont was the death knell of all those things that we thought would last forever. I personally felt like the sixties had been an extravagant stage show and I had been a spectator in the audience. Altamont had rung down the curtain to no applause."* •
Allen Ginsberg's estate is affiliated with the Naropa Institute, Boulder, CO.
UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE,
AND EVALUATE
marred by heavy rains that produced a sea of mud and by supplies and facilities completely inadequate for the unexpectedly large crowd. Drugs were everywhere in evidence, as was a kind of open sexual freedom that a decade earlier would have seemed unthinkable to all but a few Americans. But Woodstock remained peaceful, friendly, and harmonious, There was rhapsodic talk at the time of how Woodstock represented the birth of a new youth culture, the "Woodstock nation.”
Critics of the new rock, and the counterculture, were not impressed with the idea of the "Woodstock nation." To them, the essence of the counterculture was a kind of numbing hopelessness and despair, with a menacing and violent underside. To them, the appropriate symbol was not Woodstock, but another great rock concert, which more than 300,000 people attended only four months after Woodstock, at the Altamont Speedway east of San Francisco. The concert featured many of the groups that had been at Woodstock, but the Rolling Stones, who had organized the event, were the main attraction. As at Woodstock, drugs were plentiful and sexual exhibitionism was frequent. But unlike Woodstock, Altamont was far from peaceful. Instead, it became ugly, brutal, and violent, and resulted in the deaths of four people. Several of them died accidentally, one, for example, from a bad drug trip, during which he fell into a stream and drowned, But numerous people were brutally beaten by members of the Hell's Angels motorcycle gang, who had been hired by the Rolling Stones as security guards. One man was beaten and stabbed to death in front of the stage while the Stones were playing "Sympathy for the Devil."
Woodstock and Altamont, then, became symbols of two aspects of the counterculture of the late 1960s and early 1970s, and of the rock music that created its anthems. The beat poet Allen Ginsberg wrote an ecstatic poem proclaiming that at Woodstock "a new kind of man has come to his bliss / to
1.	How does rock music of the 1960s differ from rock 'h roll of the 1950s? What accounts for these differences?
2.	What two characteristics of the counterculture are represented by Woodstock and Altamont? Was there an "Altamont" nation, just as there was a "Woodstock" nation?
3.	Does popular music today challenge the prevailing culture, as rock music of the 1960s challenged the culture of that era? What lasting effects, if any, did 1960s rock have on U.S. society and culture?
small-all helped thrust the issue of the war into the center of American politics.
Closely related to opposition to the war was opposition to the military draft. The gradual abolition of many traditional deferments—for graduate students, teachers, husbands, fathers, and others-swelled the ranks of those faced with conscription (and thus of those likely to oppose it). Some draft-age Americans simply refused induction, accepting what occasionally were long terms in jail as a result. Others fled to Canada, Sweden, and elsewhere (where they were joined by deserters from the armed forces) to escape conscription. Not until 1977, when
President Jimmy Carter issued a general pardon to draft resisters and a limited amnesty for deserters, did the Vietnam exiles begin to return to the country in substantial numbers.
The Counterculture
Closely related to the New Left was a new youth culture openly scornful of the values and conventions of middle-class society. As if to display their contempt for conventional standards, young Americans flaunted long hair, shabby
"Hippies	or fiam£>Oyant clothing, and a rebellious
811
